District of Columbia statutes.
29-1201.07

Constructive notice.

A person that is not a beneficial owner is deemed to have notice of a statutory trust’s merger, interest exchange, conversion, or domestication 90 days after articles of merger, interest exchange, conversion, or domestication under subchapter VII of this chapter or Chapter 2 of this title become effective.

Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(l)(2)(D), 59 DCR 13171
Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.